en: Door Strikes
xx: Door Strikes
cs: Zamykání dveří
da: Slutblik
de: Schlossfallen
es: Cerraduras eléctricas
fr: Gâches électriques
it: Serrature
ja: ドアストライク
nl: Deurplaten
no: Sluttstykker
pl: Zaczepy do drzwi
pt: Desarmadores elétricos
ru: Электромеханические защелки
sv: Slutbleck
tr: Kapı Kilitleri

en: Doors
xx: Doors
cs: Dveře
da: Døre
de: Türen
es: Puertas
fr: Portes
it: Porte
ja: ドア・シャッター
nl: Deuren
no: Dører
pl: Drzwi
pt: Portas
ru: Двери
sv: Dörrar
tr: Kapılar

en: Garage Doors
xx: Garage Doors
cs: Garážová vrata
da: Garagedøre
de: Garagentore
es: Puertas de garaje
fr: Portes de garage
it: Porte per garage
ja: ガレージシャッター
nl: Garagedeuren
no: Garasjedører
pl: Drzwi garażowe
pt: Portas de garagem
ru: Двери для гаража
sv: Garagedörrar
tr: Garaj Kapıları

en: Home Doors
xx: Home Doors
cs: Domácí dveře
da: Døre til huse
de: Haustüren
es: Puertas para el hogar
fr: Portes d'entrée
it: Porte di casa
ja: 住宅用ドア
nl: Voordeuren
no: Boligdører
pl: Drzwi wejściowe
pt: Portas residenciais
ru: Двери для дома
sv: Husdörrar
tr: Daire Giriş Kapıları

en: Drywall
xx: Drywall
cs: Sádrokarton
da: Gipsplader
de: Gipskartonplatten
es: Pladur
fr: Plaques de plâtre, Cloison, BA13, Plaque de plâtre, Placo, Cloison\, BA13\, Plaque de plâtre\, Placo
it: Cartongesso
ja: 乾式壁
nl: Gipsplaten
no: Tørrmur
pl: Płyty gipsowo-kartonowe
pt: Drywall
ru: Гипсокартон
sv: Gipsvägg
tr: Alçı Panel

en: Flooring & Carpet
xx: Flooring & Carpet
cs: Podlahy a koberce
da: Gulve
de: Fußböden & Teppichböden
es: Suelos y moquetas
fr: Tapis et revêtements de sol, Moquette
it: Pavimenti e moquette
ja: 床材・カーペット
nl: Vloeren
no: Gulv og vegg-til-vegg-tepper
pl: Podłogi i dywany
pt: Pisos e carpetes
ru: Напольные покрытия
sv: Golvbeläggning
tr: Yer Döşemeleri

en: Glass
xx: Glass
cs: Sklo
da: Glas
de: Glas
es: Cristal
fr: Verre
it: Vetro
ja: ガラス
nl: Glas
no: Glass
pl: Szkło
pt: Vidro
ru: Стекло
sv: Glas
tr: Cam

en: Handrails & Railing Systems
xx: Handrails & Railing Systems
cs: Zábradlí a madla
da: Håndlister og gelændere
de: Handläufe und Geländersysteme
es: Pasamanos y barandillas
fr: Mains courantes et rampes d'escalier
it: Sistemi per corrimano e rotaie
ja: 手すり、手すりシステム
nl: Leuningen en leuningsystemen
no: Gelender og rekkverk
pl: Poręcze i zestawy poręczy
pt: Sistemas de corrimãos e trilhos
ru: Перила и поручни
sv: Ledstänger och räcken
tr: Küpeşteler ve Küpeşte Sistemler

en: Hatches
xx: Hatches
cs: Vikýře a průlezy
da: Lemme
de: Luken
es: Trampas
fr: Trappes
it: Portelli
ja: ハッチ
nl: Luiken
no: Luker
pl: Klapy
pt: Alçapões
ru: Люки
sv: Luckor
tr: Ambar Kapakları

en: Insulation
xx: Insulation
cs: Izolace
da: Isolering
de: Isolierung
es: Aislamiento
fr: Isolation
it: Isolamento
ja: 断熱材
nl: Isolatie
no: Isolasjon
pl: Izolacje
pt: Isolamento
ru: Изоляция
sv: Isolering
tr: Yalıtım

en: Lumber & Sheet Stock
xx: Lumber & Sheet Stock
cs: Stavební dřevo
da: Tømmer
de: Bauholz
es: Madera
fr: Planches et bois d'œuvre
it: Legname
ja: 木材
nl: Timmerhout
no: Trelast og blikk
pl: Drewno
pt: Madeira cortada
ru: Древесина
sv: Timmer
tr: Kereste

en: Molding
xx: Molding
cs: Ozdobné lišty
da: Støbning
de: Leisten
es: Molduras
fr: Moulages
it: Modanature
ja: モールディング
nl: Lijstwerk
no: Listverk og halvpanel
pl: Odlewy
pt: Molduras decorativas
ru: Отделочные материалы
sv: Lister
tr: Pervaz

en: Rebar & Remesh
xx: Rebar & Remesh
cs: Tyče a výztuže
da: Armeringsjern og armeringsnet
de: Betonstahl & -gitter
es: Barras y mallas de refuerzo
fr: Barres d'armature et grillages de renforcement
it: Barre e reticolati di ferro
ja: 鉄筋・鉄筋メッシュ
nl: Bouwstaalstaven en -matten
no: Forsterkningssøyler og nettverk
pl: Kraty i siatki zbrojeniowe
pt: Vergalhões e varões
ru: Арматура и железная сетка
sv: Armeringsjärn och -nät
tr: Betonarme Demiri ve Tel Örgü

en: Roofing
xx: Roofing
cs: Střechy
da: Taglægning
de: Bedachung
es: Techo
fr: Toitures
it: Materiali per coperture
ja: 屋根
nl: Dakbedding
no: Tak
pl: Pokrycia dachowe
pt: Telhado
ru: Материалы для кровли
sv: Tak
tr: Çatı Malzemeleri

en: Gutter Accessories
xx: Gutter Accessories
cs: Okapy – příslušenství
da: Tagrender – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Dachrinnen
es: Accesorios para canalones
fr: Accessoires pour gouttières
it: Accessori per grondaie
ja: 雨どい関連用品
nl: Gootbenodigdheden
no: Takrennetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do rynien
pt: Acessórios para calhas
ru: Принадлежности для водостоков
sv: Tillbehör till hängrännor
tr: Çatı Oluğu Aksesuarları

en: Gutters
xx: Gutters
cs: Okapy
da: Tagrender
de: Dachrinnen
es: Canalones
fr: Gouttières
it: Grondaie
ja: 雨どい
nl: Goten
no: Takrenner
pl: Rynny
pt: Calhas
ru: Водостоки
sv: Hängrännor
tr: Çatı Olukları

en: Bitumen Roofing Membranes
fr: Membranes bitumineuses - PMCB (produits et matériaux de construction du bâtiment), Membranes bitumineuses PMCB produits et matériaux de construction du bâtiment

en: Roof Flashings
xx: Roof Flashings
cs: Střešní oplechování
da: Taginddækninger
de: Kehlbleche
es: Tapajuntas de techo
fr: Solins de toiture
it: Scossaline
ja: 屋根用フラッシング
nl: Dakvoeglood
no: Takbeslag
pl: Kołnierze dachowe
pt: Rufos
ru: Системы водоотведения для крыш
sv: Taktätning
tr: Çatı Etekleri

en: Roofing Shingles & Tiles
xx: Roofing Shingles & Tiles
cs: Střešní šindele a tašky
da: Tækkespåner og tagsten
de: Dachschindeln & -pfannen
es: Tejas y baldosas para techo
fr: Bardeaux et tuiles
it: Coperture e tegole per tetti
ja: 屋根材・タイル
nl: Dakshingles en -pannen
no: Takstein og takpapp
pl: Płytki dachowe i dachówki
pt: Telhas e placas de telhado
ru: Кровельный гонт и черепица
sv: Takplattor och -tegel
tr: Çatı Shingle ve Kiremitleri

en: Shutters
xx: Shutters
cs: Okenice
da: Skodder
de: Fensterläden
es: Contraventanas
fr: Volets
it: Serrande
ja: シャッター・雨戸
nl: Vensterluiken
no: Vinduslemmer
pl: Okiennice
pt: Venezianas
ru: Ставни
sv: Fönsterluckor
tr: Panjurlar